Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 115A.93, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. License requirements; pricing based on volume or weight. (a) A licensing authority shall require licensees to impose charges for collection of mixed municipal solid waste that increase with the volume or weight of the waste collected. (b) A licensing authority may impose requirements that are consistent with the county's solid waste policies as a condition of receiving and maintaining a license. deleted text begin (c) A licensing authority shall prohibit mixed municipal solid waste collectors from imposing a greater charge on residents who recycle than on residents who do not recycle. deleted text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The commissioner may exempt a licensing authority from the requirements of paragraph (a) if the county within which the authority is located has an approved solid waste management plan that concludes that variable rate pricing is not appropriate for that jurisdiction because it is inconsistent with other incentives and mechanisms implemented within the jurisdiction that are more effective in attaining the goals of this chapter to discourage on-site disposal, littering, and illegal dumping. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end In the interim between revisions to the county solid waste management plan, the commissioner may exempt a licensing authority from the requirements of paragraph (a) if the commissioner makes the determination otherwise made by the plan in paragraph deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end and finds that the licensing authority: (1) operates or contracts for the operation of a residential recycling program that collects more categories of recyclable materials than required in section 115A.552; (2) has a residential participation rate in its recycling programs of at least 70 percent or in excess of the participation rate for the county in which it is located, whichever is greater; and (3) is located in a county that has exceeded the recycling goals in section 115A.551. An exemption granted by the commissioner in the interim between revisions to the county solid waste management plan is only effective until the county solid waste management plan is revised.